California statutes. Education Code
(1) Commencing January 1, 2017, begin development of, and each community college district subsequently shall begin adoption and implementation of, a uniform policy to award a pupil who passes an Advanced Placement examination course credit for California General Education Transfer Curriculum or local community college general education requirements, as appropriate for the pupil’s needs, in a course with subject matter similar to that of the Advanced Placement examination.

(2) Periodically review and adjust the policy adopted
 pursuant to subdivision (a) to align it with policies of other public postsecondary educational institutions.

(b) If the policy to be adopted pursuant to subdivision (a) is not implemented for the entering class in the fall 2017 academic term, the California Community Colleges shall adopt and implement, commencing with the 2017–18 academic year, the Advanced Placement policy adopted by the California State University.

(c) Each community college campus shall post on its internet website the most recent policy adopted pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 74, Sec. 7.   (SB 619)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. California Community Colleges Asian American, Native Hawaiian, and Pacific Islander Student Achievement Program [79510. - 79511.]

79510.

As used in this article, unless the context requires otherwise, the following definitions apply:

(a) “AANHPI” means Asian American, Native Hawaiian, and Pacific Islander.

(b) “Community college” means a college of the California Community College system.

(c) “Program” means the AANHPI Student Achievement Program established pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 54, Sec. 34.   (AB 183)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

79511.

(a) (1) The Asian American, Native Hawaiian, and Pacific Islander (AANHPI) Student Achievement Program is hereby established at the California Community Colleges to provide culturally responsive services to enhance student educational experiences and promote higher education success for low-income, underserved, and first-generation AANHPI students and other underrepresented students.

(2) It is the intent of the Legislature that the program be coordinated with the Asian American, Native Hawaiian, and Pacific Islander (AANHPI) Student Achievement Program established at the California State University pursuant to Article 11 (commencing with Section 89297) of Chapter 2 of Part 55 of Division 8.

(b) (1) Of the amount appropriated in the annual Budget Act for the program, up to 19 percent shall be allocated to a community college district to contract with a statewide central office at a nonprofit organization selected by the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, in consultation with the California Commission on Asian and Pacific Islander American Affairs. The office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, in consultation with the California Commission on Asian and Pacific Islander American Affairs, shall periodically review the selection contract to ensure
 program alignment and effectiveness.

(2) The statewide central office shall employ
 at least the following full-time staff:

(A) One director.

(B) One program coordinator.

(C) One program analyst.

(3) The statewide central office, in consultation with the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges and the California Commission on Asian and Pacific Islander American Affairs,
 shall develop the criteria and process for a grant program to provide funding to qualifying community colleges, pursuant to subdivision (c).

(4) The statewide central office, in consultation with the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges and the California Commission on Asian and Pacific Islander American Affairs, shall establish an AANHPI stakeholder process for purposes of the program to facilitate the statewide central office’s ability to meet the needs of the community, including students and community colleges. Stakeholders shall include higher education practitioners and students.

(5) The statewide central office shall provide support to qualifying community colleges, including, but not limited to, technical assistance, outreach, statewide and regional trainings, curriculum development, and capacity building.

(6) The statewide central office shall provide an annual report to the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges pursuant to subdivision (d).

(7) The statewide central office shall fund an independent evaluation of the program pursuant to subdivision
 (e).

(c) (1) Of the amount appropriated in the annual Budget Act for the program, at least 81 percent shall be provided to community colleges with the following qualifications:

(A) The college is eligible for the Asian American and Native American Pacific Islander-Serving Institution program authorized under the federal Higher Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1059g et seq.).

(B) The college has experience providing student support services to AANHPI students and other underserved students.

(C) The college has program staff that will coordinate with campus faculty and staff to effectively deliver support services to AANHPI students.

(2) Participating colleges shall provide all of the following services:

(A) Culturally responsive learning communities.

(B) Advising and counseling services.

(C) Mental health counseling and awareness services.

(D) Career development, career readiness, and employment services.

(E) Supplemental instruction and tutoring, such as English language development and support.

(F) Asian American, Pacific Islander studies courses and curriculum development.

(G) Leadership development, internships, and mentorships.

(d) On or before March 31 of each year, the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall submit a report to the Department of Finance and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the Legislature. The report shall be prepared by
 the statewide central office. The report shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(1) The amount of funding allocated to each participating community college.

(2) A description of the services provided by each participating community college.

(3) The number of students served by each participating community college.

(4) The number of low-income, underserved, and first-generation AANHPI students served.

(5) The number of students served who meet any of, or any combination of, the following:

(A) Completed certifications.

(B) Attained associate degrees.

(C) Attained associate degrees for transfer.

(D) Transferred.

(E) Obtained a job upon completion.

(e) On or before March 31, 2026, the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall submit a report evaluating the program to the Department of Finance and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the Legislature. The report shall be prepared by an independent evaluator selected by the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges. The report shall include an assessment of the impact of the program, including a comparison of the impact of the program relative to other support strategies implemented by each participating campus for the same or similar student groups.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 572, Sec. 9.   (AB 190)   Effective September 27, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. The Native American Student Support and Success Program [79520. - 79520.]

79520.

(a) The Native American Student Support and Success Program is hereby established under the administration of the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges to accomplish all of the following:

(1) To strengthen K–12 pathways to and through the California Community College system for Native American students, including student transfer to the University of California and the California State University systems.

(2) To ensure the educational success of Native American students.

(3) To develop Native American leaders.

(4) To increase the number of Native
 American mentors to empower future generations.

(b) A grant provided to a community college pursuant to this article is intended to establish a local Native American student support and success program to provide all of the following services to support Native American students:

(1) Integration of peer mentorship with other student success services.

(2) Development of clearly structured, coherent course-specific cohorts.

(3) Building capacity for counseling and wraparound student services offering culturally responsive resources.

(4) Development and integration of faculty and staff professional development training.

(c) (1) The chancellor’s office may enter into agreements with up to 20 community colleges to provide grants to those participating colleges for the purpose of developing local Native American student support and success programs and delivering the services described in Section 78212 to Native American students. A community college that receives a grant shall consult with California tribes in their service and surrounding area to design their local program.

(2) Each local program shall provide the services described in subdivision (b) and may direct financial support to enrolled first-time Native American students before their courses have commenced, and who have completed required matriculation activities as described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 78212, if those services are necessary to enable the student to be successful upon the commencement of the academic term.

(3) In addition to the services provided in subdivision (b), the local program may also provide additional services to Native American students, including program outreach and recruitment, program consultation and eligibility verification, career development, basic need service coordination, offering culturally responsive resources, transfer and career counseling, book and supply grants, tutoring, and other related services to ensure the educational success of Native American students.

(4) A community college that receives a one-time grant pursuant to this article shall use a portion of the grant to establish a full-time program coordinator and tribal liaison position for the purpose of implementing the services described in this article. The coordinator shall also act as a liaison between the community college and local Native American tribes for the creation and implementation of
 the program. In hiring this position, preference shall be given to qualified candidates of Native American or Alaska Native heritage in a manner similar to preference provided in the federal Indian Preference Act of 1990.

(d) (1) A community college may apply for a program grant by submitting a letter of interest to the chancellor’s office pursuant to this article. An applying community college shall certify that its services provided pursuant to this article to Native American students are coordinated with, and do not supplant, other services provided by the county or state.

(2) If the number of requests to participate exceeds the amount of available grant funding for the program, the chancellor’s office shall prioritize awarding grants to community colleges with the highest number of Native American students. Identifying Native American students eligible
 for the program should be based on state and federal tribal recognition, linear descendancy, and community involvement. A participating community college is encouraged to request additional data to determine the eligibility of student participants and potential student participants from local tribal communities and local educational agencies.

(e) (1) A community college that receives a grant pursuant to this article shall annually report to the chancellor’s office, on or before July 1 of each year following receipt of the grant, information, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(A) A summary of services supported with the grant.

(B) The number of students supported by services provided with the grant.

(C) Academic
 progress and outcomes of students who received support services provided with the grant, including course completion rates, persistence data, transfer rates, and career placement outcomes.

(2) The chancellor’s office shall develop and submit to the Governor and the Legislature, pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code, on or before September 1, 2024, on or before September 1, 2027, and on or before September 1, 2030, a report based on the data and information reported by participating community colleges pursuant to paragraph (1) and information on the use of funds made available for the program.

(3) A report submitted pursuant to this subdivision shall include
 information from the academic year immediately preceding the reporting deadline.

(f) As used in this section, unless the context requires otherwise, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Chancellor’s office” means the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges.

(2) ”Program” means the Native American Student Support and Success Program established pursuant to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 9, Sec. 11.   (AB 123)   Effective June 27, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 49. COMMUNITY COLLEGES, EDUCATION FACILITIES [81003. - 82548.]



  CHAPTER 1. School Sites [81003. - 81192.]



  ARTICLE 1. Location [81003. - 81005.]

81003.

Subject to Section 66904, a community college may build campus facilities on school, local government, or other public property not owned by the community college, if the community college obtains permission from the owner of the public property to do so.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1059, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

81004.

(a) A community college may develop a public-private partnership for the purpose of constructing education buildings or education centers. The facilities may be constructed on a site donated through the public-private partnership agreement between the community college and the private sector. The construction of any education building or education center is subject to approval by the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges if the education building or education center is eligible for state funding for construction, equipment, or ongoing maintenance. Community colleges shall not be eligible to receive state funds for off-campus centers unless recommended by the California Postsecondary Education Commission pursuant to Section 66904.

(b) (1) If a community college requests state funding for an education building or education center constructed through a public-private partnership, funding for that facility shall not supersede community college facilities that have been previously prioritized by the board of governors and are awaiting state funding. These facilities shall be subject to the board of governors’ annual prioritization process and shall not receive higher priority for state funding solely because the facilities are constructed through a public-private partnership.

(2) Any state funding to reimburse a community college for construction of a facility pursuant to this subdivision shall not exceed that community college’s share of costs.

(c) A community college may request state funding for instructional equipment for an education building or education center that is constructed through a public-private partnership or that is acquired without state funding. However, funding for that equipment shall be provided in the same manner as for other community college facilities, provided that the construction or acquisition of the facility otherwise would have qualified as a priority project for state funding.

(d) On or before January 1, 1999, the board of governors shall adopt regulations to implement this section. However, prior to adopting these regulations, the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall consult with the Department of Finance and the Legislative Analyst.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 342, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

81005.

(a) State funds provided for the capital outlay financing needs of the California Community Colleges may be used to acquire an existing government-owned or privately-owned building and for the necessary costs of converting that building to community college use. A community college district that is eligible for state funding for capital outlay financing may purchase an existing government-owned or privately-owned building and convert it to community college use with state funds if all of the following criteria apply:

(1) The building to be purchased was constructed as, and continues to qualify as, a school building pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 81130), or the building is determined to have, or is rehabilitated to an extent that it is determined to have, a pupil safety performance standard that is equivalent to that of a building constructed pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 81130). In making the determination of the pupil safety performance standard as required in this paragraph, all of the requirements of paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 81149 shall be met.

(2) The total cost of purchasing and converting the existing building to community college use is not greater than the estimated cost of constructing an equivalent building.

(3) The land associated with a building to be purchased will be owned by, or controlled through a long-term lease by, the community college district. As used in this section, “long-term lease” means a lease with a term of at least 50 years.

(4) The district has complied with facility site review procedures and guideline recommendations of the California Postsecondary Education Commission pursuant to Section 66904.

(b) Funding for a building to be purchased under this section shall not supersede funding for community college facilities that have previously been prioritized by the board of governors and are awaiting state funding. Buildings purchased under this section shall be subject to the annual prioritization process of the board of governors, and shall not receive higher priority for state funding because they are existing buildings rather than buildings proposed to be constructed.

(c) A community college district that purchases an existing building under this section may request state funding for instructional equipment. Funding for that instructional equipment shall be provided in accordance with Chapter 4.8 (commencing with Section 84670) of Part 50, provided that the chancellor determines that the purchase of this equipment qualifies as a priority for state funding.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 649, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. School Sites [81031. - 81033.]

81031.

The board of governors shall establish standards for community college sites.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 470, Sec. 204.)
-------------------------------------------

81033.

(a) The governing board of a community college district, prior to acquiring any site on which it proposes to construct any school building as defined in Section 81130.5, shall have the site, or sites, under consideration investigated by competent personnel to ensure that the final site selection is determined by an evaluation of all factors affecting the public interest and is not limited to selection on the basis of raw land cost only. If the prospective college site is located within the boundaries of any special studies zone or within an area designated as geologically hazardous in the safety element of the local general plan as provided in subdivision (g) of Section 65302 of the Government Code, the investigation shall include any geological and soil engineering studies by competent personnel needed to provide an assessment of the nature of the site and potential for earthquake or other geological hazard damage.

The geological and soil engineering studies of the site shall be of a nature that will preclude siting of a college in any location where the geological and site characteristics are such that the construction effort required to make the school building safe for occupancy is economically unfeasible. No studies are required to be made if the site or sites under consideration have been the subject of adequate prior studies. The evaluation also shall include location of the site with respect to population, transportation, water supply, waste disposal facilities, utilities, traffic hazards, surface drainage conditions, and other factors affecting the operating costs, as well as the initial costs, of the total project.

For the purposes of this article, a special studies zone is an area that is identified as a special studies zone on any map, or maps, compiled by the State Geologist pursuant to Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 2621) of Division 2 of the Public Resources Code. A copy of the report of each investigation conducted pursuant to this section shall be submitted to the board of governors.

(b) Geological and soil engineering studies as described in subdivision (a) shall be made, within the boundaries of any special studies zone, for the construction of any school building as defined in Section 81130.5 or, if the estimated cost exceeds twenty thousand dollars ($20,000), for the reconstruction or alteration of or addition to that building for work which alters structural elements. The Department of General Services may require similar geological and soil engineering studies for the construction or alteration of any building on a site located outside of the boundaries of any special studies zone. These studies need not be made if the site under consideration has been the subject of adequate prior studies.

No school building shall be constructed, reconstructed, or relocated on the trace of a geological fault along which surface rupture can reasonably be expected to occur within the life of the school building.

A copy of the report of each investigation conducted pursuant to this section shall be submitted to the Department of General Services pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 81130) and to the Chancellor’s office of the California Community Colleges. The cost of geological and soil engineering studies and investigations conducted pursuant to this section may be treated as a capital expenditure.

(c) To promote the safety of students, comprehensive community planning, and greater educational usefulness of community college sites, the governing board of each community college district, if the proposed site is within two miles, measured by air line, of that point on an airport runway, or runway proposed by an airport master plan, which is nearest the site and excluding them if the property is not so located, before acquiring title to property for a new community college site or for an addition to a present site, shall give the board of governors notice in writing of the proposed acquisition and shall submit any information required by the board of governors.

Immediately after receiving notice of the proposed acquisition of property which is within two miles, measured by air line, of that point on an airport runway, or runway proposed by an airport master plan, which is nearest the site, the board of governors shall notify the Division of Aeronautics of the Department of Transportation, in writing, of the proposed acquisition. The Division of Aeronautics shall make an investigation and report to the board of governors within 30 working days after receipt of the notice. If the Division of Aeronautics is no longer in operation, the board of governors, in lieu of notifying the Division of Aeronautics, shall notify the Federal Aviation Administration or any other appropriate agency, in writing, of the proposed acquisition for the purpose of obtaining from the authority or other agency any information or assistance it may desire to give.

The board of governors shall investigate the proposed site and, within 35 working days after receipt of the notice, shall submit to the governing board a written report and its recommendations concerning acquisition of the site. The governing board shall not acquire title to the property until the report of the board of governors has been received. If the report does not favor the acquisition of the property for a community college site or an addition to a present community college site, the governing board shall not acquire title to the property until 30 days after the department’s report is received and until the board of governors’ report has been read at a public hearing duly called after 10 days’ notice published once in a newspaper of general circulation within the community college district, or if there is no such newspaper, then in a newspaper of general circulation within the county in which the property is located.

(d) If, with respect to a proposed site located within two miles of an operative airport runway, the report of the board of governors submitted to a community college district governing board under subdivision (c) does not favor the acquisition of the site on the sole or partial basis of the unfavorable recommendation of the Division of Aeronautics of the Department of Transportation, no state agency or officer shall grant, apportion, or allow to that community college district for expenditure in connection with that site, any state funds otherwise made available under any state law whatever for community college site acquisition or college building construction, or for expansion of existing sites and buildings, and no funds of the community college district or of the county in which the district lies shall be expended for those purposes. However, this section shall not be applicable to sites acquired prior to January 1, 1966, or to any additions or extensions to those sites.

If the recommendation of the Division of Aeronautics is unfavorable, the recommendation shall not be overruled without the express approval of the board of governors and the State Allocation Board.

(e) No action undertaken by the board of governors or by any other state agency or by any political subdivision pursuant to this chapter, or in compliance with this chapter, shall be construed to affect any rights arising under Section 19 of Article I of the California Constitution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 109.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Building Standards [81050. - 81055.]

81050.

“School building,” as used in this article, means any building used, or designed to be used, for community college purposes and constructed by the state, by any city, county, or city and county, by any district of any kind within the state, by any regional occupational center or program created by or authorized to act by an agreement under joint exercise of power, or by the United States government, or any agency thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 552, Sec. 34.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

81050.5.

(a) (1) For the purposes of this article, Article 7 (commencing with Section 81130), and Article 8 (commencing with Section 81160), “school building” does not include any building used or intended to be used by a community college district as residential housing.

(2) The Department of General Services shall approve plans and specifications for a residence for students attending a campus of a community college upon a request by the community college district, pursuant to Sections 81130 and 81160.

(b) As used in this section, “residential housing” means any building used as a personal residence by a teacher or employee of a community college district, with the teacher’s or
 employee’s family, if applicable, and any building used as a residence for students attending a campus of a community college district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 83, Sec. 1.   (AB 358)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

81051.

(a) Each school building that has been placed on the National Register of Historic Places, and to be used for community college purposes, shall be renovated according to the Field Act, as defined in Section 81130.3. If subdivision (b) applies, that building may be renovated according to the regulations adopted by the State Architect pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 17280.5.

(b) The governing board of a community college district that proposes to renovate, pursuant to this section, a school building that does not comply with the Field Act shall hold a public hearing, after giving appropriate public notice, for the purpose of gaining public input on the matter. The governing board shall adopt its decision on this proposal at a public hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 552, Sec. 34.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

81052.

Each school building constructed, reconstructed, modified, or expanded after July 1, 2006, on a community college campus shall be built according to the Field Act, as defined in Section 81130.3, or according to the California Building Standards Code, as adopted by the California Building Standards Commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 35, Sec. 14.   Effective May 20, 2006.   Operative after November 7, 2006 (Prop. 1D was adopted) by Sec. 25 of Ch. 35.)
-------------------------------------------

81053.

(a) To ensure that community college districts are able to effectively exercise the option of utilizing the Field Act or the California Building Standards Code, as provided in Section 81052, and construct buildings safely, cost effectively, and in a timely manner, the Department of General Services shall develop and submit, in consultation with the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges, by June 1, 2009, to the California Building Standards Commission proposed building standards for adoption as part of the California Building Standards Code that will govern the construction, reconstruction, modification, or expansion of school buildings of a community college district as provided in Section 81052, if the community college district elects not to utilize the Field Act. The Department of General Services shall review and include, where appropriate, in these standards the standards that govern the California State University. The proposed building standards shall provide for independent plan review and oversight to be performed by the Department of General Services. The standards shall become effective 30 days after adoption by the California Building Standards Commission.

(b) The Department of General Services shall be responsible for plan reviews consistent with Section 81133.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 704, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

81054.

(a) The Legislative Analyst’s Office (LAO) shall undertake a fact-based analysis of the length of time the Department of General Services and the community colleges take to perform their respective functions to complete community college construction and alteration projects. This information shall be compiled in a report made available to the Legislature and the Governor by March 1, 2009.

(b) Following the issuance of the report described in subdivision (a), the Department of General Services shall convene a working group advisory committee consisting of a representative from the Department of General Services, the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges, the Associated General Contractors of California, and the Professional Engineers in California Government. The working group shall analyze the report and the current process to complete community college construction and alteration projects and develop recommendations for changes, if any, in the project development and review process to ensure the public safety of community college facilities through a collaborative, consistent, cost-effective, and timely project development and review process. The recommendations shall include proposed timeframe goals for the performance of each specific task performed by the Department of General Services and by private design professionals performing services for a community college district and an assessment of the staffing and other resource needs of the Department of General Services to perform its tasks related to the construction or alteration of community college facilities. The recommendations shall be submitted in writing to the Department of General Services, working group members, the Senate and Assembly Committees on Appropriations, the Senate Committee on Education, the Assembly Committee on Higher Education, and the education budget subcommittees of the Assembly and Senate by December 31, 2009.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 704, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

81055.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Affordable rent” means an amount consistent with the rent limits established by the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee.

(2) “Extremely low income faculty or staff” means an employee of the California Community Colleges who satisfies the requirements of Section 50106 of the Health and Safety Code.

(3) “Lower income faculty or staff” means an employee of the California Community Colleges who satisfies the requirements of Section 50079.5 of the Health and Safety
 Code.

(4) “Satellite campus” means an auxiliary classroom or a teaching site not a part of the main campus.

(5) “University housing development project” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 21080.58 of the Public Resources Code.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, a community college district is not required to comply with the zoning ordinances of a city, county, or city and county for a university housing development project constructed on property owned or leased by a community college district, if the parcel on which the project will be constructed meets either of the following requirements:

(1) The parcel is contained either
 wholly or partially within a one-half mile radius of a main campus, as defined in Section 94849.

(2) The parcel is contained either wholly or partially within a one-half mile radius of a satellite campus that existed before July 1, 2025.

(c) If the university housing development project includes units for faculty and staff, the community college district shall ensure that a portion of the units are made available at affordable rents to extremely low income faculty and staff and to lower income faculty and staff.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 378, Sec. 1.   (AB 648)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Approvals [81130. - 81149.]

81130.

(a) The Department of General Services under the police power of the state shall supervise the design and construction of any school building or the reconstruction or alteration of, or addition to, any school building, if not exempted under Section 81133, to ensure that plans and specifications comply with the rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this article and building standards published in Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations, and to ensure that the work of construction has been performed in accordance with the approved plans and specifications, for the protection of life and property. Nothing in this section shall be construed to allow a community college district to perform work with its own forces in excess of the limitations set forth in Article 41 (commencing with Section 20650) of Part 3 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code.

(b) Whenever repairs due to fire damage must be made to any school building previously approved by the Department of General Services, the approved plans and specifications used in the original work under then existing rules, regulations, and building standards may be used without modification, providing all other provisions of this article are carried out.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 390, Sec. 3.   Effective August 27, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

81130.3.

This article, together with Article 3 (commencing with Section 17280) and Article 6 (commencing with Section 17365) of Chapter 3 of Part 10.5 and Article 3 (commencing with Section 81050), shall be known and may be cited as the “Field Act.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 35, Sec. 15.   Effective May 20, 2006.   Operative after November 7, 2006 (Prop. 1D was adopted) by Sec. 25 of Ch. 35.)
-------------------------------------------

81130.5.

(a) This article does not apply to an offsite building during the time the building is used wholly or in part for community college purposes, if the building is neither owned by a community college district nor leased by a community college district under a lease containing an option to purchase that building. For the purposes of this section, an “offsite building” is a building that is situated on land that is neither owned by a community college district nor leased by a community college district under a lease containing an option to purchase the land.

(b) “School building,” as used in this article, means and includes any building used, or designed to be used, for community college purposes and constructed, reconstructed,
 altered, or added to, by the state or by any city or city and county, by any political subdivision, by any district of any kind within the state, by any regional occupational center or program created by or authorized to act by an agreement under joint exercise of power, or by the United States government, or any agency thereof.

(c) Where the primary use of either a building or complex within which the building is situated, operated by an official or board of a city, city and county, or county, or by a nonprofit foundation for a building or complex located on land owned by the United States, is for purposes other than educational, such as, but not necessarily limited to, correctional, forestry, or hospital purposes, the building shall not be considered to be a “school building” as defined in this section, notwithstanding any educational use thereof incidental to the primary purpose.

(d) For the purposes of this article and Article 8 (commencing with Section 81160), “school building” does not include any of the following:

(1) Any building of a community college district that is used solely for classes or programs in outdoor science, conservation, and forestry and that does not occupy, in whole or in part, the same parcel of land upon which there is situated any school maintained by the district.

(2) Agricultural facilities that were not built for classroom purposes and that are used primarily for plant and animal production or the storage of materials, equipment, and supplies involved in that production.

(3) Animal kennels and facilities used to house animals as part of an animal health instruction program.

(e) “Construction or alteration,” as used in this article, includes any construction, reconstruction, or alteration of, or addition to, any school building.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 53, Sec. 22.   (SB 77)   Effective July 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

81130.6.
